Hawaii statutes.
[§200-4.5] Safety of ocean users;
rules. The department shall adopt rules to promote greater safety of ocean
users in the State's nearshore waters. The rules shall include but not be
limited to the creation of safe zones for free divers and swimmers and stricter
enforcement of boating regulations around swim zone buoys. [L 2012, c 195, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next